src/morphology/stemparts/nouns.lexc
LEXICON N_TALO



















0    N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0    N_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
0    N_BACK_PLURALS ;
0    N_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN ;
0    N_BACK_ILLATIVE_ON    ;
0    N_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA    ;
0    N_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
0    N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0    N_COMPOUND_0    ;
0    N_COMPOUND_N ;
0    N_COMPOUND_JEN ;


LEXICON N_ASU












0    N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0    N_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
0    N_BACK_PLURALS ;
0    N_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN ;
0    N_BACK_ILLATIVE_UN    ;
0    N_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA    ;
0    N_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
0    N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0    N_COMPOUND_0    ;
0    N_COMPOUND_N ;
0    N_COMPOUND_JEN ;

LEXICON N_KÄRRY










0    N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0    N_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
0    N_FRONT_PLURALS ;
0    N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä_ÄN ;
0    N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_YN    ;
0    N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ    ;
0    N_FRONT_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
0    N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0    N_COMPOUND_0    ;
0    N_COMPOUND_N ;
0    N_COMPOUND_JEN ;

LEXICON N_MÖMMÖ










0    N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0    N_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
0    N_FRONT_PLURALS ;
0    N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä_ÄN ;
0    N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ÖN    ;
0    N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ    ;
0    N_FRONT_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
0    N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0    N_COMPOUND_0    ;
0    N_COMPOUND_N ;
0    N_COMPOUND_JEN ;



LEXICON N_UKKO




0:ko      N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:ko      N_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:o    N_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
0:ko      N_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS ;
0:o    N_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS    ;
0:ko      N_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN ;
0:ko      N_BACK_ILLATIVE_ON    ;
0:ko      N_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA    ;
0:ko      N_FRONT_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
0:ko      N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:ko      N_COMPOUND_0    ;
0:o       N_COMPOUND_N ;
0:ko      N_COMPOUND_JEN ;


LEXICON N_TIKKU




0:ku   N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:ku   N_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:u    N_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
0:ku   N_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS   ;
0:u    N_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS   ;
0:ku   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN ;
0:ku   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_UN    ;
0:ku   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA    ;
0:ku   N_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
0:ku   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:ku      N_COMPOUND_0    ;
0:u       N_COMPOUND_N ;
0:ku      N_COMPOUND_JEN ;


LEXICON N_MYRKKY




0:ky   N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:ky   N_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:y    N_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
0:ky   N_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS ;
0:y    N_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS ;
0:ky   N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä_ÄN ;
0:ky   N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_YN    ;
0:ky   N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ    ;
0:ky   N_FRONT_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
0:ky   N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:ky      N_COMPOUND_0    ;
0:y       N_COMPOUND_N ;
0:ky      N_COMPOUND_JEN ;

LEXICON N_YÖKKÖ




0:kö   N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:kö   N_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:ö    N_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
0:kö   N_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS ;
0:ö    N_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS ;
0:kö   N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä_ÄN ;
0:kö   N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ÖN    ;
0:kö   N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ    ;
0:kö   N_FRONT_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
0:kö   N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:kö      N_COMPOUND_0    ;
0:ö       N_COMPOUND_N ;
0:kö      N_COMPOUND_JEN ;

LEXICON N_HAPPO




0:po      N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:po      N_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:o       N_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
0:po      N_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS ;
0:o       N_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS    ;
0:po      N_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN ;
0:po      N_BACK_ILLATIVE_ON    ;
0:po      N_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA    ;
0:po      N_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
0:po      N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:po      N_COMPOUND_0    ;
0:o       N_COMPOUND_N ;
0:po      N_COMPOUND_JEN ;


LEXICON N_LIPPU




0:pu   N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:pu   N_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:u    N_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
0:pu   N_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS   ;
0:u    N_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS   ;
0:pu   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN ;
0:pu   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_UN    ;
0:pu   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA    ;
0:pu   N_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
0:pu   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:pu      N_COMPOUND_0    ;
0:u       N_COMPOUND_N ;
0:pu      N_COMPOUND_JEN ;


LEXICON N_RYYPPY




0:py   N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:py   N_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:y    N_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
0:py   N_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS ;
0:y    N_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS ;
0:py   N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä_ÄN ;
0:py   N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_YN    ;
0:py   N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ    ;
0:py   N_FRONT_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
0:py   N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:py      N_COMPOUND_0    ;
0:y       N_COMPOUND_N ;
0:py      N_COMPOUND_JEN ;

LEXICON N_TÖRPPÖ




0:pö   N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:pö   N_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:ö    N_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
0:pö   N_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS ;
0:ö    N_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS ;
0:pö   N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä_ÄN ;
0:pö   N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ÖN    ;
0:pö   N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ    ;
0:pö   N_FRONT_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
0:pö   N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:pö      N_COMPOUND_0    ;
0:ö       N_COMPOUND_N ;
0:pö      N_COMPOUND_JEN ;

LEXICON N_HIRTTO




0:to      N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:to      N_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:o       N_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
0:to      N_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS ;
0:o       N_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS    ;
0:to      N_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN ;
0:to      N_BACK_ILLATIVE_ON    ;
0:to      N_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA    ;
0:to      N_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
0:to      N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:to      N_COMPOUND_0    ;
0:o       N_COMPOUND_N ;
0:to      N_COMPOUND_JEN ;


LEXICON N_TORTTU




0:tu   N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:tu   N_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:u    N_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
0:tu   N_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS   ;
0:u    N_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS   ;
0:tu   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN ;
0:tu   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_UN    ;
0:tu   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA    ;
0:tu   N_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
0:tu   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:tu      N_COMPOUND_0    ;
0:u       N_COMPOUND_N ;
0:tu      N_COMPOUND_JEN ;


LEXICON N_PYTTY




0:ty   N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:ty   N_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:y    N_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
0:ty   N_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS ;
0:y    N_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS ;
0:ty   N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä_ÄN ;
0:ty   N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_YN    ;
0:ty   N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ    ;
0:ty   N_FRONT_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
0:ty   N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:ty      N_COMPOUND_0    ;
0:y       N_COMPOUND_N ;
0:ty      N_COMPOUND_JEN ;

LEXICON N_PÖNTTÖ




0:tö   N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:tö   N_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:ö    N_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
0:tö   N_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS ;
0:ö    N_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS ;
0:tö   N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä_ÄN ;
0:tö   N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ÖN    ;
0:tö   N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ    ;
0:tö   N_FRONT_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
0:tö   N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:tö      N_COMPOUND_0    ;
0:ö       N_COMPOUND_N ;
0:tö      N_COMPOUND_JEN ;


LEXICON N_TEKO






0:ko      N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:ko      N_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:o       N_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
0:’o      N_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
0:ko      N_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS ;
0:o       N_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS    ;
0:’o      N_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS    ;
0:ko      N_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN ;
0:ko      N_BACK_ILLATIVE_ON    ;
0:ko      N_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA    ;
0:ko      N_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
0:ko      N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:ko      N_COMPOUND_0    ;
0:’o      N_COMPOUND_N ;
0:o       N_COMPOUND_N ;
0:ko      N_COMPOUND_JEN ;


LEXICON N_MAKU



0:ku   N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:ku   N_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:u    N_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
0:’u   N_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
0:ku   N_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS   ;
0:u    N_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS   ;
0:’u   N_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS   ;
0:ku   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN ;
0:ku   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_UN    ;
0:ku   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA    ;
0:ku   N_FRONT_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
0:ku   N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:ku      N_COMPOUND_0    ;
0:’u      N_COMPOUND_N ;
0:u       N_COMPOUND_N ;
0:ku      N_COMPOUND_JEN ;


LEXICON N_NÄKY



0:ky   N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:ky   N_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:y    N_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
0:’y   N_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
0:ky   N_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS ;
0:y    N_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS ;
0:’y   N_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS ;
0:ky   N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä_ÄN ;
0:ky   N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_YN    ;
0:ky   N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ    ;
0:ky   N_FRONT_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
0:ky   N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:ky      N_COMPOUND_0    ;
0:’y      N_COMPOUND_N ;
0:y       N_COMPOUND_N ;
0:ky      N_COMPOUND_JEN ;

LEXICON N_NÄKÖ



0:kö   N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:kö   N_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:ö    N_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
0:’ö   N_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:kö   N_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS ;
0:ö    N_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS ;
0:’ö   N_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS ;
0:kö   N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä_ÄN ;
0:kö   N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ÖN    ;
0:kö   N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ    ;
0:kö   N_FRONT_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
0:kö   N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:kö      N_COMPOUND_0    ;
0:’ö      N_COMPOUND_N ;
0:ö       N_COMPOUND_N ;
0:kö      N_COMPOUND_JEN ;

LEXICON N_RUOKO






0:ko      N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:ko      N_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:’o      N_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
0:ko      N_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS ;
0:’o      N_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS    ;
0:ko      N_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN ;
0:ko      N_BACK_ILLATIVE_ON    ;
0:ko      N_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA    ;
0:ko      N_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
0:ko      N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:ko      N_COMPOUND_0    ;
0:’o      N_COMPOUND_N ;
0:ko      N_COMPOUND_JEN ;


LEXICON N_LIUKU


0:ku   N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:ku   N_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:’u   N_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
0:ku   N_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS   ;
0:’u   N_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS   ;
0:ku   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN ;
0:ku   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_UN    ;
0:ku   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA    ;
0:ku   N_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
0:ku   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:ku      N_COMPOUND_0    ;
0:’u      N_COMPOUND_N ;
0:ku      N_COMPOUND_JEN ;




LEXICON N_HEPO




0:po      N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:po      N_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:vo       N_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
0:po      N_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS ;
0:vo       N_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS    ;
0:po      N_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN ;
0:po      N_BACK_ILLATIVE_ON    ;
0:po      N_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA    ;
0:po      N_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
0:po      N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:po      N_COMPOUND_0    ;
0:vo      N_COMPOUND_N ;
0:po      N_COMPOUND_JEN ;


LEXICON N_APU




0:pu   N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:pu   N_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:vu    N_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
0:pu   N_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS   ;
0:vu    N_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS   ;
0:pu   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN ;
0:pu   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_UN    ;
0:pu   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA    ;
0:pu   N_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
0:pu   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:pu      N_COMPOUND_0    ;
0:vu       N_COMPOUND_N ;
0:pu      N_COMPOUND_JEN ;


LEXICON N_KÄPY




0:py   N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:py   N_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:vy    N_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
0:py   N_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS ;
0:vy    N_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS ;
0:py   N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä_ÄN ;
0:py   N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_YN    ;
0:py   N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ    ;
0:py   N_FRONT_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
0:py   N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:py      N_COMPOUND_0    ;
0:vy       N_COMPOUND_N ;
0:py      N_COMPOUND_JEN ;

LEXICON N_LÖPÖ




0:pö   N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:pö   N_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:vö    N_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
0:pö   N_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS ;
0:vö    N_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS ;
0:pö   N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä_ÄN ;
0:pö   N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ÖN    ;
0:pö   N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ    ;
0:pö   N_FRONT_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
0:pö   N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:pö      N_COMPOUND_0    ;
0:vö       N_COMPOUND_N ;
0:pö      N_COMPOUND_JEN ;

LEXICON N_VETO




0:to      N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:to      N_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:do       N_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
0:to      N_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS ;
0:do       N_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS    ;
0:to      N_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN ;
0:to      N_BACK_ILLATIVE_ON    ;
0:to      N_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA    ;
0:to      N_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
0:to      N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:to      N_COMPOUND_0    ;
0:do       N_COMPOUND_N ;
0:to      N_COMPOUND_JEN ;
